Nevada, session 83, AB168.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 484B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a person
operating a bicycle upon a roadway shall stop in obedience to a
stop sign or traffic-control signal displaying a steady red signal.
2. A person operating a bicycle approaching an intersection
controlled by a stop sign may proceed cautiously through the
intersection without stopping if the person:
(a) Ascertains that such movement can be made safely;
(b) Decreases the speed of the bicycle and confirms that the
intersection is clear before entering the intersection; and
(c) Yields the right-of-way to pedestrians and all vehicles
whose proximity constitutes an immediate hazard.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, a person
operating a bicycle upon a roadway may proceed cautiously
through an intersection where the signal is a steady red signal or
make a turn through any such intersection if the person:
(a) Stops before entering the intersection as required by
subsection 1;
(b) Ascertains that such movement can be made safely; and
(c) Yields the right-of-way to pedestrians and all vehicles
whose proximity constitutes an immediate hazard.
4. A person operating a bicycle upon a roadway shall not turn
left through an intersection where the signal is a steady red signal
unless the roadway onto which the person is turning is a one-way
roadway.
Sec. 2. NRS 484B.760 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.760 1. It is a civil infraction punishable pursuant to
NRS 484A.703 to 484A.705, inclusive, for any person to do any act
forbidden or fail to perform any act required in NRS 484B.768 to
484B.790, inclusive [.] , and section 1 of this act.
2. The parent of any child and the guardian of any ward shall
not authorize or knowingly permit the child or ward to violate any
of the provisions of chapters 484A to 484E, inclusive, of NRS.
3. The provisions applicable to bicycles, electric bicycles and
electric scooters apply whenever a bicycle, an electric bicycle or an
electric scooter is operated upon any highway or upon any path set
aside for the exclusive use of bicycles, electric bicycles and electric
scooters subject to those exceptions stated herein.
Sec. 3. NRS 484B.763 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.763 Every person riding a bicycle, an electric bicycle or
an electric scooter upon a roadway has all of the rights and is subject
-
*AB168_R1*

– 3 –
to all of the duties applicable to the driver of a vehicle except as
otherwise provided in NRS 484B.767 to 484B.790, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, and except as to those provisions of chapters
484A to 484E, inclusive, of NRS which by their nature can have no
application.
H
-
*AB168_R1*